

    HOME
    MONE HISTORY
    COMMON ANCESTOR
    GATHERING 2006-08
    GATHERING 2010
    GATHERING 2012
    KEADY & DERRYNOOSE
    POINTS OF CONTACT
    TRIBUTE
    EMAIL

These authors, now long gone, took time to put their thoughts on paper: doing so, they left a  wonderful history that can be shared by all.
			keady & derrynoose 	
	home | email 	 
		
		
	

 
A History

of the Parishes of Keady and Derrynoose:

The following information was provided in a booklet from John Makem, a resident of Derrynoose and a local historian. The articles were written by local residents and provide insight about what life was like in Keady, Derrynoose, and Ireland in General.

Contents:

1.  "KEADY   ‘Ceideas (Gaelic) –Assembly Place", by  Gerry Mone, 1965.

2.  John Keating, follow up to article number one, 1975;

3.  "A BRIEF HISTORY OF THE PARISH OF KEADY AND DERRYNOOSE" is written by an unknown author.

4. "KEADY"  written by an unknown author.

5. "Translation of Names of some local Townlands and places" author unknown.

6. External links for photos of the Keady area.

Explanation of articles included: 

In order to provide the articles on this web site, it was necessary to transcribe the much photocopied articles of the booklet. In doing so, the format was changed slightly and punctuation added in places where I thought clarification was needed. However, the context of the writings were not changed in any way. Although every attempt was made to ensure that the entire text was copied correctly, there is undoubtedly some mistakes. I apologize for any omissions or misinterpretations, but feel it is important to provide this priceless information to Mone descendants, because it relates to Irish life in the area of our ancestors.   Patrick Mone

 1.  KEADY   ‘Ceideas (Gaelic) –Assembly Place     Back to Top

 How did Keady originate?    

The greatest source of information of the origination of Keady can be had in the records of Church of Ireland (Episcopalian) St. Mathews. It was erected in the year 1775. The road at the time from Keady to Castleblayney was up Church St., past the church via the man-o-war hill in Lagan.

Lagan was a barren land without habitation covered with whins and shrub. Keady was supplied with water by two wells, one on Church St, behind Arthur Mone’s land and the other in Newholland, both have long since been filled up. 

The first building in Meeting St. was the Presbyterian church, erected in the year 1803, known as the ‘meeting house’, the way to it was from Church St. from Arthur Mone’s gateway and it was only a beaten path for walking. Probably the next building erected was “The Shandon Bells”. It was a barrick at that time. Then as Keady grew a most substantial building was erected in Bridge St. in the year 1876. When it was vacated for the present Barrick, Frank Slavin bought it and now John McKeever (Slevin’s son in law) carries on the hardware business in it. Keady at the beginning consisted of Church St. and a few houses on Main St. and a row in the Square. Keady town got its name from the Square, which is in the townland of “Keady”. 

The family of John Cunningham (My great grandfather) carried on a shipping trade in their hometown Rathfriland, Co Down.  He came to Tassagh at the age of 15 years served his time to Blacksmithing, married Mary Trodden, probably at Ballymacnab. It is thought that he and his brother came from Rathfriland in a hurry after an fray with the police (yeomen). His brother broke a police mans arm. At that time a deed like that was punishable with death or transportation. His brother fled to America and John fled to Keady (a very insignificant hamlet at the time). It is not known whether he was married at the time, but I do know that he built himself a hut in the square and started a Blacksmith shop. He had a wonderful knowledge of the ailments of animals and very soon became a most respected member of the community. He prospered and bought the ground from Samuel McCabe and his brother for three houses in what was known as Victoria St. When he had them built he sold them and he bought another 60 ft. of frontage on the same side of the street that is the east side. On it he built three houses.  

These six houses, as a matter of fact, all that row of houses were demolished in 1965 to make way for the present street. They started to build Lir Gardens in 1967. Built by the U. D. C.

Crossmore Green (“The White City”) was built on what was known as “Carvil’s Meadow” around the year 1950. Built by the Housing Authority.  

The Catholics first worshipped in Keady at the Mass Rock in Newholland. If you follow the river marching Patsy McCann’s land and travel along it about 30 ft. inside John Rice’s boundary half-way up on that face of rock. The inquisite seeker should have no difficulty in finding a flat rock specially known as Mass Rock. 

Just beside Mass Rock was one of two wells, which supplied Keady with water in those early days. According to tradition, a gentleman (a protestant) and his daughter were driving past in their coach. It was snowing heavily at the time and Mass was being said. This young lady filled with compassion for the poor Catholics begged her father to give them shelter. He gave them a barn he had. It was situated in that part of the graveyard between Pat McParlands and Gollaghys.  While they still worshipped in the barn they built a church around it, which served them until they built the present Church in 1860. The town hall rates with the Church of Ireland as the oldest building in town. It was constructed with free stone and brick. It was meant as a symbol of “Free Masonry” built in 1870.  

Back to Top

The first protestant school (opposite the present barrick) is now derelict. Tradition has it that one of the sub-Kings of Ireland was drowned in Clea Lough, while crossing from Mountainy road. At the middle ramper his horse stumbled and he was drowned in the swirling waters.  Under recent renovations to Clea Lake by the Water Board the middle ramper is no longer visible. By the way Clea Lake is an everlasting supply of fresh water, it is being literally covered with strong springs. Keady was a very prosperous little town indeed until what was known as the “Hungry Thirties”. It had three mills working for the manufacture of linen, which gave full employment. The Kirk family were in no small way responsible for this and the working people to show their appreciation collected the money and erected the present monument in the middle of the town.  There has been several attempts to have the monument removed altogether over the past 30 years. As a matter of fact there was a pillar on each side of the present monument. They were demolished by the Urban District Council to widen the street on each side of it. The pillars were about 10 ft. high. 

The primary reason for its removal is because the Union Jack flies above it. The Unionists always claimed the right to fly the Union Jack on it, though where they got it is beyond my comprehension. After all it was mostly Catholics who paid for the erection. 

What of the land surrounding Keady; well there is a vain of land, which is rich in red soil extending from Castleshane in Co. Monaghan through Drumhillary, Temple Crosskeys and on to Lisnadill. This is of the best quality of land for cropping or grazing. Well draw another imaginary line a mile from this to North of Keady and the land is of lesser quality and the soil is a bright brown in colour but still very good land with unlimited depth of till. The further you travel to the South the land deteriorates until you reach the mountains (“The Brague”) when it finally peters out to nothing but bracken and inferior type peat.  

The Ball-alley at the low end of the town was erected by the parochial funds. It never was suitable for playing because it was too short and I never remember a serious game played on it. It has remained derelict for years. There was an excellent Ball-alley in Derrynoose and many a great game I had on it. We had a hand ball club – chairman myself, vice president Paddy Mone (Vet) RIP, Sec. Kevin Arthurs and Treasurer Teddy Hughes, up to the end of the 1940”s and because of constant badgering from Derrynoose we handed over the funds over £32 to Tommy McAnally (Sec.) with Tommie Kelly (Treasurer). That ended both badgering and the club. In a way it was a pity because we organized some keenly fought competitions.

Keady can also boast of probably the oldest dramatic club in County Armagh. It dates back to 1840, to almost the beginning of Keady, but the last group after winning numerous awards and cups are now defunct and there does not seem to be anyone to re-organize it, more the pity.  

Keady also has the honour of being the one place in Co. Armagh to have kept hurling alive all down through the years. In this year 1965 Armagh reached the All Ireland Jun. final after beating Waterford in the semi-final at Armagh. Hurling now seems to be in the ascendancy ‘more power to it’. It is Ireland’s oldest game and still the best. I can visualize a great future for it, now with the advent of television, for which it is so suitable. What I have written is taken from my head at random. The spelling may not be all that could be desired (it was always one of my greatest failures). My grandfather Patrick Mone was born at Carnagh, Keady. His mother was Sally Fegan (Genties). When his father died, his mother and family were evicted from their farm, because the oldest child was a girl (that was the law in existence at that time). Had the eldest child been a boy, he would have been given tenance of the farm. The family moved into the town of Castleblayney and Patrick came to work as a blacksmith for my great grandfather John Cunningham and he eventually married his daughter Ellen Cunningham who had been a keen businesswoman.  

At the beginning of this century Keady was known as “The town of the Tailors”.  Smyths (owned by Lenaghs now) employed as many as 16 tailors and with Watter’s drapery and Fegans (Teddy Hughes now) they made all clothes by hand. I can remember my aunt Mary McCooey making as many as two dozen shirts per week in her own home. She also attended to the shop and carried on a catering trade on Fair days and market days (Fridays) when farmers and their wives came to the town for their week’s provisions in the horse and cart.

Back to Top

Derrynoose had a protestant rector named Oliver Gray (a Planter) in 1613. That was 140 years before Keady parish was formed at all. Then the Scotch settlers began to move into Keady and started the linen industry because of an ample supply of water from the river Callan and Clea Lake. They made a “catch down” covering 2 roods of ground known as the “Bottom” just behind our house on Victoria St. The water was piped from there to the wheel, which provided the power for the working of machinery in the mill. The pipes were 3 ft. in diameter (approx) and were made of light metal, like galvanized. In the 1940s my father fought a lawsuit for ownership of this bottom and lost. Afterwards Kirk’s estate offered it to him for the sum of £10. He refused although it must have cost him several times that amount to fight the case.  It was afterwards sold to Keady UDC for £50 by Charles Mallon acting for the Kirk’s estate. 

The first rector of the Church of Ireland named the Rev. Dickton was severely beaten up a short distance out of Keady on the Tassagh Road because of his sympathy for the native Irish people.

The bells of St. Mathews and St. Patrick’s churches were purchased in Dublin and were transported at the same time by water up the canal as far as Blackwatertown. The Catholics and Protestants joined to bring them by horses to Keady. Apparently they were more friendly towards each other then.

  I have always found it impossible to denote any difference in tone between the two bells. Has this fact a greater significance.

   Back to Top

Some interesting facts about Keady

THE CENSUS OF HARDY YEAR 1659

TOWNLAND
	

NO. OF PEOPLE
	

IRISH
	

ENGLISH

Granemore
	

12
	

12
	

Nil

Dundrum
	

9
	

9
	

“

Darkley
	

8
	

8
	

“

Tullyglush  / Rathcarbery
	

23
	

23
	

“

Crossmore
	

10
	

10
	

“

Drumderg
	

10
	

10
	

“

Crossdened
	

12
	

12
	

“

 This is the Town of Keady

Keady (Year)
	

1851
	

1861
	

1881
	

1891
	

1901
	

1911
	

1926
	

1937
	

1953

Population
	

1,252
	

1,566
	

1,598
	

1,426
	

1,466
	

1,434
	

1,341
	

1,260
	

1,462

 

These are the parishes
	

R. Catholic
	

Episcop
	

Presbyterians

YEAR

1891
	

KEADY

DERRYNOOSE
	

3,411

2,100
	

1,000

580
	

1,533

850
  	  	  	  	 

Back to Top

D. Bleakly founded the bleaching business at Annvale in 1752. The spreading ground for bleaching comprised 250 acres. The webs of cloth manufactured at Keady for the year 1822 amounted to £360,000. Darkley linen mill closed in 1959. 

Population of Newtown in   1851 = 1,209

                           1951 = 586 

In 1862 Keady came under the Town Improvement Act.

The last Fair to be held in Keady was on the second Friday of October 1959.

 

Church hill
	

is 596 ft above sea level

Madden hill
	

is 582
	

“

Keady hill
	

Is 569
	

“

Pisgah hill
	

Is 700
	

“

Drumbunnion hill
	

Is 800
	

“

Keady is higher up than Castleblayney.

 The townlands of Crossdened (meaning in Irish “The cross of the Holy Place”) and Crossmore (“The Big Cross”) converge in Market St. It was around this spot that wheat is supposed to have fallen in the form of a cross from St. Patrick’s horse. On this spot our ancestors thought fit to erect that monstrosity known as the “monument”.

All the houses on the East of Main St. from the mill right down to the station were built by J. Hughes (known as “The Mayor Hughes”) and who on his death willed them to St. Patrick’s College, Armagh. The college in turn sold them mostly to the occupiers. J. Hughes lived where the catholic curates live now.

Keady Parochial Hall, St. Patrick's was erected in 1954 at a cost of £26,000. Fr. McKeown was so instrumental in it’s erection that it became known among people as “Fr. McKeown’s Hall”.

A word which prefixes different places in the townland of Clea is “Gentle” (meaning fairies or gentle people) and it is said that the Breens of Clea were strong, fearless men and owning land which was always associated with the “gentle people” proceeded to dig it up with spades for cultivation. It is also said “That their cattle and horses began to die one by one until at the end of the year there wasn’t a four footed beast left on their farm”.  

Now this might appear silly but the people in my younger days believed in the existence of fairies. They had a host of superstitions, such as, leaving wild May flowers on their door-steps on the eve of May morning and leaving bread and milk on the table for the fairies. A red-haired woman was taboo altogether. I knew my father to turn back home when going to a fair because he met a red-haired woman. On no account must you look at a new moon through a window. They dressed the young boys as girls to delude the fairies in case the fairies would take the strong young boy away and leave a sickly one in his place. The last word war seems to have put an end to all these superstitions but then the world has advanced so much in the past 25 years that there has not been much time for superstitions. 

The Pound Bridge was demolished in 1964.

Uncle Joe born 1889.

John Cunningham died 1897 (approx) aged 72 years.

Queen Victoria was crowned in 1837 and it was partly due to her handling of Irish affairs that brought on so much distress to the Irish people in her reign.

 

THE BOOK OF ARMAGH

In 1004 Armagh was visited by Brian Boru. The event is recorded in the eighth century gospel “The Book of Armagh” as is his gift to the church of 20 ounces of gold. He commended “My soul to God and my body to Armagh” and on his death in 1014 at the battle of Clontarf his remains were brought to Armagh and buried at the Church of Ireland cathedral.

Back to Top

_________________________________________________________________________________
2. John Keating's Follow Up Article

The foregoing notes were written by the late Gerry Mone (RIP). It would undoubtedly have been his wish that these writings would be preserved and handed down to his sons. As a tribute to his memory I would ask any who read this to know that Gerry Mone was my Ideal of the perfect Gaelic Irishman, a sincere religious Catholic whose hobbies and pastimes (as his writings shows) were all traditionally Gaelic and traditionally Irish i.e. hurling, Gaelic football, handball, dramatics, The Hunt Club etc. He passed on at the comparatively early age of 54. May his kindly Irish soul find eternal rest. To his sons I say, always remember Gerry Mone was a man to be proud of. 

This booklet was given to the present writer John Keating by Mrs. Gerry Mone with the request that I should add to it from my very limited store of folk-lore and local tradition. As there is nothing that I can add about Keady or indeed that I know of Keady, which has not already been said, and I can only write of my own district the townland of Clea and Mountainy road.  As Clea formerly “Cleadgh” means “Shin bone of the mountain” it must follow that the Mountainy road and Clea are synonymous. The winding old road is traditionally said to be part of the way followed by the cortege of Brian Boru on its way from Clontarf to Armagh. Be that as it may every place name around the district is fraught with ancient history. Thus Tivenamara “The hill of the slain” a small townland to the west of Clea is said to be the scene of a battle between Cuchullan and the Chaps from the west that he tussled with.  To the East “Tullanawood” or “place of Meeting” is said to be where Brian Boru or his envoys came to claim the Boru or tribute imposed by Brian on Northern Kings. Today Tullanawood is famous as a trout fishing center, as the conservatory board have taken pains to stock its lake with trout and make it a tourist and fishing attraction. Other local place names with their Gaelic idiom are: “Garranroe” or the “Red Horse”. There may be a local saga connected with the name but I have not heard it. Kilcam, “Lonely Wood” is at present re-afforestated and known as Carnagh Wood. At the time of writing it’s by no means a “lonely wood” as it is alongside main road from Armagh and Keady to Castleblayney and near the border Customs post, Mullaghaoy i.e. lonely hill. Near here too is Drumbunion believed to be the highest arable land in Northern Ireland.  

I did not do any research into what I am saying here and am relying on information got from older generations especially from research done by the late Father Michael McDermott (RIP) when a curate in this parish. My regret now is that I did not get enough information from local historians about 35 years ago. However as I was then in my twenties I suppose I had other interests. I suppose the present generation look on us old Fogeys as ‘squares’ for being interested in the like. 

Farming was for long the principal occupation in the area but in later years many of the smaller farmers are traveling to jobs outside the district and farming as a side-line. The pattern of life has completely changed during the past 50 years in most rural areas and here is no different. In the early years of this century and indeed up to the beginning of the 1939-45 War the practice of “hiring” was prevalent in most country districts and the hiring Fair usually in May and November was the usual labour exchange in the days of our fathers. Newtownhamilton was famous for the best hiring fair in Co. Armagh. There, so much human flesh was bargained for (little better than the days of slavery). There the lives of little boys and girls, some around twelve or thirteen years were given to the charge of a Mistress or Master for a period of six months, no money being paid until the “term” was finished. A number of unwritten laws governed these transactions most of which were not in the workers interest. Thus if a boy or girl decided at any time to leave by reason of homesickness, an abusive master or mistress, overwork or for any reason whatever he or she was said to have broken the contract and the farmer could not be compelled to pay him though two, three or four months work had been done. Although not all employers took advantage of this, and in fact to do so, was the exception rather than the rule, yet many a young boy or girl lost a month or two’s work for which no wages were paid. The employer too had little redress if he found himself saddled with an indolent, lazy or impertinent employee for six months except for better luck next time. As the law of the land gave little redress to the worker against the inequitable behaviour of a tyrannical master, so too, “the servants” as they were known, had their own crude way of imposing retribution on a more than abusive employer. Thus when the next hiring fair came round, such a one became ostracized, prospective employees refusing to do any deal with them, indeed in extreme cases tyrannical masters had to flee the fair by back entrances leaving behind their mode of transport to be collected later. As in the main in Co. Armagh the bigger or better class farmers lived in mid or north Armagh so they came to South Armagh to seek their workers. The principal supply came from Keady taking in Newtownhamilton, Cullyhanna, Crossmaglen and in fact most of South Armagh. Picture if you can a little girl 13 or 14 years taken from say the parish of Cullyhanna (perhaps the eldest child of a widow mother) and deposited, I can use no other word, say at Loughgall where the Characteristics, mode of speech and life in general is so much different from what she had known. I am not painting a picture, nor am I writing about the middle ages, I have in mind youngsters that I knew and worked with. Remember there was little State aid for the widow or orphans till after the Second World War.   

Back to Top

No I am writing of happenings in the late twenties and early thirties. In “upstairs downstairs” the kitchen was the domain of the servant. In my experience in the years I write of the boiling house was very often the domicile of the little maid and her uniform an apron made from a jute bag, except on washday when she sweated over a washtub in the washhouse. As the hiring period, the “term” as it was called lasted six months and as transport from North to South Armagh was then practically nil you can imagine the yearning and counting of the hours until “losing day” the last Saturday of May or November as the case may be. Then could the youngster make his or her way home with a few pounds usually £6 for a school leaving girl and £8 or £9 for a boy! But, in two cases in, or to my own knowledge it happened, a little girl went home carrying within her the offspring of a spoiled son of her employers. In each case £100 passed to the parents of the girl concerned and the matter was squashed. I did not set out to make this a dissertation about the hiring fair, but, as in my youth I cursed and despised the system which made such things possible and being I suppose a socialist at heart I am giving vent to a feeling long suppressed. In all fairness too, I must add that there were many kind and gentle employers where the servant was treated like one of the family. In general however when you hear someone speak of the good old days he or she was not likely to be referring to his days as a hired labourer in the twenties or thirties. As I have said the practice stopped in the late thirties not with the wishes of the farmers but because work became plentiful in England as she was building up her armaments for a war she knew was inevitable and more young people began to emigrate. In South Armagh too about this time a different pattern emerged. When DeVelara decided to with-hold the land annuities from England the sanctions were imposed against the import of Irish cattle by J H Thomas, they, I suppose unconsciously, cut off a supply of cheap labour for the Northern farmer as smuggling business built up and a young fellow if he were lucky enough could earn as much in a week as before he earned by being hired for six months. Today when I see young girls in their smart uniforms go to work in their modern factories and remember what I have seen young girls from the same background suffer, I say a fervent “Thank God” that those days are gone forever. 

Much has been written. Undoubtedly much is still to be written about Landlordism in Ireland. As anyone who has read Kickham’s “Knocknagow” will understand, the lot of the peasant farmer was not one to be envied. Historians have told us about the plantation of Ulster. An erroneous opinion seems to be prevalent that Cromwell drove the Catholics to West of Ireland (“To Hell or Connaught”) and planted English or Scotch settlers in their homes. While to a large extent this may be so, yet not all Irish peasants were driven to Connaught, many of them settling and being allowed to in the bogs and most barren parts of the province. As I mentioned earlier (writing about another subject) and referring to Co. Armagh, all prosperous farmers live in Mid or North Armagh because that is where the most fertile land is, thus where the planters settled. As even they had to come south for their hewers of wood and drawers of water the humble peasant was allowed to remain. As a young boy I can remember an old lady and gentleman, whom I have since discovered must have been born around the early 1840’s, tell my father and mother that their great grandfather was banished from his very good farm in Co. Tyrone. The story as they told it was – Their great grandfather Phil Breen with his neighbour Mick Cardbury were dispossessed of their farms and traveling South through Co. Armagh for three days they decided that the first green grass they would find (that is a small fertile area in a bog through which they were traveling) they would cast lots for it and the winner make his home there. The first oasis in this dessert of heather was near what is now Gentleowen’s lake. Breen having won the draw they built a sort of cabin for him and his family. Traveling in a Southeasterly direction the next fertile spot was near Tullinawood Lake and here Cardbury made his abode. Tradition does not really give us enough information about how they existed in these wildernesses at least till they had a plot cultivated to grow potatoes. Yet it is a historical fact that in the famine years there were fewer deaths in these bog lands than in the fertile plains.   

However carrying on the story of the Breens it seems they wrested from the bog a sizeable area of arable land. It is told that when the first son married he made an extension to the house, thus making two houses under one roof. Later another son decided to convert the barn into a dwelling for himself and his bride. The families grew and multiplied and their descendants are still numerous in the district. The original dwellings, three houses in one yard, were still occupied by the Breens up to about 1910 and in fact two modern houses occupied by their descendants are still there.  

The reader my wonder how Landlordism came to these backward areas. Well it seems when all the more fertile areas were “planted” the government in charge in Charlie II’s reign, to raise money (Charlie’s tastes being expensive) granted large tracts of mountain and bog land either for payment of a sum of money or in some cases, of army officers, in recompence for services rendered. In these deals the new owner became the landlord with instructions to make all dwellers thereon his vassals and take rent from them. As can be readily be understood these transactions having taken place in Dublin or London the new owner came with a rough sketch map of his territory and papers authorising him to take possession. (I have seen such a copy of one such authorisation.) Can you visualise an Englishman who may have never been in Ireland before set out to seek the boundaries of his newly acquired territory in mountainous terrain like South Armagh.

Back to Top

There is a local tradition in the Keady area concerning the first coming of a certain local landlord. It is told he left Dublin to take possession of certain territories allotted to him in this area. As it was November and dreary wet weather he became completely lost and his horse struck lame. After being repeatedly sunk in quagmire he was found by a trooper separated from his company. Giving the trooper his lease on the estate and his lame horse in exchange for the trooper’s sound horse he made his way back to Dublin. The trooper registering his claim and taking possession of the estate at a later date. Such is the story told about the coming of our first landlord in the Keady area. As can be expected the coming of landlords was not heralded by fanfares of trumpets in these remote areas. Thus the landlords had to group together to take census of their scattered tenants. These groups known as yeomen were feared and dreaded by the tenants so much that underground tunnels were dug which can still be traced sometimes like one I knew of, connecting two homes about 200 yards apart.

Tenants too, began organising, and groups known as Bogmen, Ribbonmen, Peepoday boys were formed for the harassment of Yeoman and landlords. In these circumstances it is not surprising that it took about 150 years before holdings were registered as were known in the 19th and early 20th century. For some reason the Irish peasant, together I suppose with the Scotch, gave an unrequited allegiance to the Stewart Monarchs which was in no way to their advantage. In the case of Charles the Second, this merry Monarch caused as much disturbance in Ireland as the Accursed Cromwell whose diabolical work he carried on, some of the results, which can be felt to the present day. By his “Divine Right of Kings” he even took upon himself to sell the eels in Lough Neagh. Well at least he did make a deal about Lough Neagh eel fisheries and processing that has only recently been settled.

So much for the remote past, but what about landlord and tenant in the Keady area in our father’s time. The principal part of the parishes of Keady and Derrynoose were in what was then known as the Dobbin Estate, comprising the farms adjoining Keady and townlands included Clea, Lagan, Crossdened and others comprising a couple hundred families: the Kirk estate taking in Darkley and all adjoining territories. The Carnagh estate was owned by the Irwin family. This is the estate referred to earlier and traditionally said to be acquired for a sound horse. Carnagh estate comprised most of Carnagh and Derrynoose - all the remaining lands were owned by McKanes of Laragh (Absentee Landlords).  

We, in the Clea district were as I said of the Dobbin estate. I can vividly recall the rent notice, which came religiously before every 1st November. I must have devoured tons and tons of literature during my more than 60 years much of which I have forgotten, yet for some reason, the wording of that curt note on a plain unsealed postcard sticks out in my memory after 50 years. It read as follows:

11 Dame Street Dublin

Dear Sir, It will attend at my office Old Bank House Keady on 1st November to receive all rents due by you to Miss Jane Jenkins Dobbin. 

Yours etc.

      William Hunter agent for the above 

The Dobbins were amongst the poorer type landlords, possibly being no wealthier than some of their better off tenants. Their last possession in Keady “Willowbank” is now owned by Dr Eric Dorman. The above Miss Jane J Dobbin I can remember as a frail kindly old lady. She resided in Dublin during her later years but made a point of visiting the school attended by the children of her tenants every Christmas-time, bringing prizes to pupils, the best in each subject, and I suppose the teachers connived to see that all and everyone specialised in something every boy and girl usually got a prize.  

Prizes in my time at school consisted of usually something serviceable like silk scarves, neckties, woolen hosiery and such like for boys and equally appropriate gifts for girls. As Miss Dobbin presided at this prize giving and it was sort of a gala day we children had no fault to find with our landlady. Perhaps some of our parents who may have had to sell the best calf a few weeks previously to find rent may not have agreed with us, but I still look on Miss Dobbin as a kindly old dame.

Back to Top

Another branch of the Dobbin family lived in ‘Rathcarbury House’ now owned by Mr. F Slevin. With the buying out of the land in 1925 and with death of the elder son of this family, estate and death duties piling up, the last owner of this family property fell on hard times and was in fact evicted himself by the government for non-payment of debt.

This latter Mr. John Dobbin a humorous harmless old gentleman with perhaps too much of an acquaintance with Messrs Jameson, Power and Guinness tells a joke against himself as follows. Being evicted from his home and having nowhere to stop that night he forced open a window and spent the night in his own house. Next morning he was arrested and lodged in Armagh Gaol. It being the custom (probably still is) for the crime or offense to be printed over the inmates cell door. In his case “Breaking and Entering” were entered. At exercise time on his second day an old lag approached and said, “Tell me Buddy, was there much swag in the joint you broke into”. Dobbin replied, “No it was an empty house”. The old lag replied “you stupid mutt” and he refused to take our friend under his notice for the remainder of his stay. With the passing of John Dobbin about twenty years ago so ended the Dobbin Epoch. As landlords they were said down through the generations to be amongst the best.

The Irwins of Carnagh estate were of the typical landlord class, historians tell us about. Here the “Big House” as the landlord’s residence is invariably referred to, was in the center of the estate. Here the Irwins formed about 300 acres and kept an estimable staff of labourers. As they were what was then described as “Gentry” they employed a house staff of butlers, footmen, parlour maids, kitchen maids, lady’s maids, cooks, coachmen and the usual conglomeration of staff which snobbery demanded as the status quo in these establishments. My great grandfather Patrick Connolly “Stewart Paddy” was landsteward on the estate during the 1840’s and 1850’s. As over the years different heads of the family being in charge the lives of tenants were affected by the characteristics and temperament of the overlord of the moment. The three that I have heard most mentioned being the “Old Major”, the “Wee Captain”, and the “Young Major”. These being I believe the grandfather, son and grandson. 

Most tales are told of the “Wee Captain” who it seems was a bit of a martinet. I did not trouble to do any research as these are but random jottings, but I believe this gentleman was lord of the manor during the last decades of the nineteenth century and in the first years of the present century. As already mentioned about 300 acres were farmed around the “Big House”. The labourers employed being for the most part taken from amongst the tenantry. However in the Wee Captain’s time the story goes, with truth, as I understand, all tenants were in addition to paying their rent compelled to give a certain number of unpaid “duty days” to the landlord. I understand about ten days per household was the quota expected. As the tenancy extended over a number of fairly thickly populated townlands it can be assumed that an elaborate work force could be called upon at any time. It is also told, and vouched for, by old men I have talked to, that when the work force was assembled, the Captain kept walking along the boundary of the field. Seeing someone lag behind, he shouted, in a voice acquired in Barrick Square, Barney or Bill, Mick or Joe, as the case might be “You are getting behind. Come here till I kick your arse”.  The culprit had to take up a certain stance, which was to stand with his head down and his hands on his knees, till the punishment was duly administered then resume his place in the line of workers. 

Nor did the wife of the tenant farmer escape completely in those days. In the 1940’s I worked for a certain Mr. Nesbitt then an old gentleman in his early seventies. As his people were tenants on the Irwin Estate he told me many tales of the customs on the estate in the latter years of the nineteenth century, which may seem harsh and barbarous to us but were normal procedure in those days. Thus the landlord often accompanied by his lady, visited his tenants twice yearly. (Note I am referring to the Carnagh estate). Amongst other things the housewife had to produce for inspection all of the poultry reared on the holding during the year. If an exceptionally fine flock of cockerels were running around, the lady of the manor commented favourably on them and finished by saying “We are having guests at the Big House” on a date mentioned, “Just send two of those up”. In the case of turkeys or geese, a fat goose or turkey was expected at the Manor for Christmas. If the housewife failed to show any poultry she was lectured for her unthriftiness and her husband’s chance of getting a renewal of his lease damaged. In the case of workers if a young girl of exceptionally smart appearance grew up on the estate, her mother was asked her age and told to send her to the Big House to be trained as whatever type of maid was required. Of course it was looked on as an honour in those times to get work in the Big House. 

The buying out of the holdings from the landlords in 1925 and 1929 made a big change in the relationship of the tenant and the former landlords. This scheme simply meant that the Government paid the landlords a fixed sum of money for each holding occupied by a tenant. This sum was then made out as a loan or debt on the tenant to be paid over a number of years (usually 60). This is paid twice yearly to the Ministry of Finance and known as land annuities.

With the buying out of the tenants in Carnagh the occupiers of the Manor House lost their hold on the farming community. As a military family the Gentleman of the Irwins were on service during both wars in this century: the estate being managed by the landsteward and ladies of the family. With the Manor lands of over 300 acres and as the last occupier of the property had a substantial army pension the family occupied a position of considerable influence in the district and were able to maintain at least a semblance of a staff of servants while they remained in Carnagh. With the death of the last Major Irwin in the 1960’s the lands were taken over by the Forestry Commission and planted with trees. The “Big House” of former years was taken over by the tourist board and made into a hotel. The tourist association have spent a considerable amount of money making walks, avenues and caravan sites throughout the estate, and with three course fishing lakes set amongst the rustic scenery a continual stream of visitors can be met here at any time during the summer months.

Back to Top

Again the old order changeth. The passing of the Irwins from Carnagh ended a couple centuries of a regime that I suppose people had become accustomed to. Whilst stories are told to their discredit and though the “Wee Captain” may have planted a kick in the posterior of an occasional workman, as landlords went in those days, I have not heard of any evictions of their tenants for non-payment of rent. Nor were there any absentee landlords among them. There are few tales of evictions or the “battering ram” in the Keady area, at least not that I have heard of. 

As young people of this generation have but a hazy idea of what evictions really meant in our grandfather’s time or of the power wielded by a tyricannical landlord, I propose we take a trip of 5 or 6 miles into Co. Monaghan in fact to the next “Big House” or Manor Farm after the Irwin’s Estate. Here in the townland of Corratanty a few miles to the Keady side of Castleblayney the Batesons were landlords of a very large area in Co. Monaghan. This Bateson, a vile and ruthless tyrant, occupied the residence at Corratanty at present owned by Mr. Thomas McBennett  - auctioneer.  

At the time I write of, around the years 1870’s and early 1880’s this evil landlord decided on a wholesale clearance of all tenants and householders from a number of townlands in the parish of Muckno in the Castleblayney area. After driving all the tenants from their homes in the townland of Upper Corratanty and Killogola his hirelings were made to level the humble dwellings, the stones being used either to make roads around the estate, or to build barns and byres on the estate. Needless to say the lands taken from these luckless tenants were added to the farm occupied by the landlord, which they adjoined. 

The present writer having worked as a farm labourer with the McBennett family during the 1930’s (the present owner of the estate) every field in this estate is known to him. As every field contains 10 or 12 acres, each represents what had been a home and little farm for some Irish peasant. Often I have stood with some old man looking over these broad acres and pointing with his staff he would say, “There in that corner was the home of the Duffy family. In the next field dwelled the McNallys” and thus these old men in the 1930’s could recall and tell of the little homes and families where now the bullocks graze.

Having cleared all homes and tenants from the townland of Upper Corratanty, this nefarious undertaking having been finished in the autumn (I think the year 1882 – this could be verified) plans were made and a bridge built across the river to the adjoining townland, the consensus of opinion being that in the spring of the next year the enforced exodus of all humans from the townland of Lower Corratanty was to be proceeded with. The stones from these little dwellings being intended to build a castle on a hill-top on the estate.

 It was now time for the tenants to take a hand in the matter. As they had no chance of redress from any but themselves, the powers that had been, in those days being of the opinion that bullocks were more profitable and easier controlled than an unruly peasantry, thus if a landlord decided to switch from human to bovine stock, the Government took no hand in the matter. 

Secret meetings being held behind locked doors and as it was he or they, the elimination of Bateson was decided on. During that eventful winter, in the lives of those concerned in this drama collections were made to pay the passage to America of whomsoever might be called on to do the deed. Unwisely and unfortunately the names of those who contributed being put on paper. In those days secret meetings, were often anything but secret, as the Constabulary (the RIC) often recruited from the local rural areas, had their spies in all districts and the RIC being the eyes and ears of the Government, very little happened that the authorities had not at least a slight knowledge of. Then too sums of money were available to be paid to any informant and it is not to the credit to the Irish peasant that these monies were sometimes collected.  The misnomer “Stag”, “Castle Hack”, informer and such names were coined during those times and given to someone suspected of giving information.

Back to Top

To carry on the story of Bateson however it is told that he was informed that he was to be murdered and in addition to wearing a bullet-proof vest he had a guard of police or military when traveling to and from his residence to his office in Castleblayney. However he must have relaxed his vigilance because his murdered body was found beside what is now known as the rectory gate on the main Keady - Castleblayney road. As this was now a murder case detectives were on the scene and on the scent immediately. As already mentioned the names of many associated, evenly remotely with the plot were inadvertently committed to paper. This list of names was then in a house in the parish of Oram in the townland Drollagh (and as they say to this day) acting on information received the police went to collect this or these documents.  

It is here there entered on the scene a clergyman whose name is enshrined in the minds and hearts of people from Castleblayney and the adjoining districts. I refer to Reverend Father McConnell. Hearing that the police were gone in quest of the papers and knowing that these contained information enough to have some of his parishioners transported and many more to get lengthy Gaol sentences if nothing worse; Father Pat, as he was then known, procured the fastest horse possible to find in Blayney, and taking a different route he succeeded in having the incriminating documents burned before the police arrived.

Living in the townland of Drollagh at the time were two brothers Peter and Patrick Kelly and as a scapegoat had to be found for the Bateson killing, for some reason, which has never been proven, the Kelly brothers were arrested. Immediately witnesses were forthcoming to prove that the Kellys were in a district at least eight miles from the scene of the murder and at the time of the killing. However despite this sworn alibi the Kellys were arraigned for murder.

Here again the name of Father McConnell comes up, but I’m afraid this time with a bit of embellishment. It is told that the Kellys were being given a preliminary hearing prior to being returned for trial. Father Pat not being in the court for the start of the trial, he came hurrying in as evidence of arrest was being given. The story is told that, as the sun was shining, a beam of sunlight reached from the window to the floor. The clergyman walking quickly up the courtroom, divested himself of his overcoat as he came, he threw the coat across the sunbeam where it rested for all to see. A certain amount of evidence being given, the magistrate intimated that he intended returning the Kellys for trial. Father McConnell asked to give evidence on their behalf. In the witness box he told the magistrate that he, the magistrate, knew the Kellys to be innocent. Then striking the desk before the magistrate he shouted “If you persist in sending the Kellys for trial I will here and now put Bateson in the witness box and make him tell if the Kellys were connected with the killing”. For the sake of something to say the magistrate asked “Will you leave him back again”? “No your Worship” replied the priest “I will leave that for you to do”.

The Kellys were not sent for trial. I have talked to men of the older generation whose fathers recalled vividly the trial of the Kellys and while most were skeptical about the tale of the coat on the sunbeam, all agree that the threat to put Bateson in the witness box was genuine. (Here’s to Father McConnell and long may he reign. He said before he would see the Kellys die he would bring Bateson back again).

Back to Top

Subsequently three others were arrested and charged with murder. These three were Neil Quinn, Bryan Grant, and Patrick Coomby. It is told that Quinn and Grant were arrested, as they were about to board a ship for America. As Quinn and Grant were known to be members of the “patriotic brotherhood”, a semi-secret society in vogue around Castleblayney and Crossmaglen at that time they would have been marked men. They were also involved in what later came to be known as the Crossmaglen conspiracy. After a long and protracted trial all three were hanged, I believe at Mountjoy. There is a local tradition in the district that whilst Grant and Quinn may have been involved in the tragedy, Patrick Coomby was hanged in the wrong. It is told that on the night of the killing (as the story goes a dismal rainy night) a man called at Coomby’s little cabin in the Drumboory hills and asked if he could get his coat dried. Coomby offered him a dry coat and told him to leave the wet coat to be exchanged later. The wet coat with traces of blood being found in Coomby’s possession he paid the supreme penalty.

As I have already said I worked as a farm labourer in this district in the early thirties. Older men must have remembered Coomby for I have heard old men, of both Catholic and Protestant religion, say he was a quiet inoffensive man not involved in politics or any kind of society. I knew and worked with his two sons Ned and Pat Coomby but never got so intimate with them to speak about their father. They were already elderly men when I knew them, and lived and worked as farm labourers in the Castleblayney area till their death.

After the killing of Bateson the “Big House” as a landlord residence became obsolete, his agent turning into a drunken lunatic. The estate was sold in the 1920’s to James McBennett  - auctioneer.

I have stood on a hilltop and looked over these hundred acres devoid of homesteads, then gazed across the river at the little homes and farms which might so easily have been swept away at the whim of one man. And three men were hanged for murder. O God, the Ireland of our Fathers.

With the coming of television, passed from the Irish countryside a way of life: the cealidghe house, the folklore, the old storyteller like McManus’s “Lad of the O’Friels”, we had our “Toal-A-Gallaghers”, we had what then constituted our debating societies and I have yet to enjoy a night’s entertainment like the nights when as a boy of eleven or twelve I sat around a turf fire and listened to the sages of those days debate such things as Columcille’s Prophecies or tell tales of the famine, evictions, or disasters. How those old men could make events of perhaps a hundred years previously come alive as if they were yesterday. My grandfather John Keating was born where we now reside in 1825. His father Henry Keating was I understand born about 1790. In the 1920’s I have heard old men talk not of the doings or sayings of my grandfather but of Old Harry as they referred to him. One old man used to say “I heard the old folk say old Harry built this dyke” or old Harry made that lane thus as I have said, bridging the years and making a hundred years seem as nothing.

Back to Top

Of the famine in this area I have heard tales not of death and pestilence but of survival. I have mentioned earlier that it has been recorded that fewer deaths occurred in the remoter areas in Ireland than in some fertile areas. Perhaps because they were trained over the years to subsist on very little. Quite near where I live are the walls of a cabin, where in the famine years dwelt a widow with two daughters. The old folk tell that this widow’s possessions at the start of the famine were twelve young hens and two goats, also a small garden. The story told is that being presented with a small bag of grain she fed her hens on the grain thus keeping them laying and leading her goats where the most succulent pasture was to be found she kept them milking, thus with goat’s milk and eggs alone, she kept herself and her daughters alive and healthy for two years that the famine was at its worst. Our modern cooks have umpteen ways of cooking an egg but the older generation had faith in what they referred to as egg nog. This was made by simply breaking one or two eggs in a pint of milk, stirring gently and bringing to a boil. Old people claimed that three cupfuls of this beverage per day could keep one alive indefinitely. Yes many tales are told of survival during the great hunger. On the little farm where I live it is told that two fields consisting of three acres were sold for three hundred weight of oatmeal during the famine years. This may have kept our family from becoming extinct or from enforced emigration.

Another custom, which has passed into oblivion with the older generation, is the custom of matchmaking. Many tales were told in my youth about matches made and matches that failed to come off. It seemed that quite often the young people had no say in their own destiny, as the following story (which has been vouched by several) will illustrate. I must be circumspect as the descendants of the families involved are still residing in the district. In any case the match was being made between a gentleman from an adjoining parish and a girl from Keady parish. As it is a custom for a girl from prospering farming stock to get what was then termed her ‘fortune’; the dispute arose between the respective fathers as to how much this fortune would be. As the two old ones in question - being both stern stubborn men - neither would yield a little bit. The plans for the wedding ceremony having been gone with, the wedding was arranged for a certain Thursday morning in Keady Chapel. On the night before the ceremony was to have taken place, the bargaining continued, as haggling can, between stubborn farmers and arbitrators and negotiators being brought to the scene, the particulars were advised to sleep on the matter and settle it in the morning. It being then the custom for the bride and groom to travel together to church on “side cars” or as they were commonly known as “Irish jaunting cars” the bridal party having left for church, negotiations completely broke down. The groom’s father having firmly asserted that he would never let his son “put a ring on her” if the bride did not get the dowry he insisted on. As the wedding party had been on the way for some time, a swift horseman was sent to intercept them before they reached the chapel. As parental control, for good or ill, must have meant something then the complete wedding party had to turn for home. In the meantime some friends of the bride and for the honour of the family proposed making up the outstanding amount of the dowry themselves. Honour now being satisfied, permission for the ceremony to take place was duly given. Living near the bride-to-be’s home was a young man who owned a contraption referred to by older generations as a whirligig or simply as the machine. As it was possible for the gentleman in question to hurtle over distances at an incredible speed services were requisitioned to intercept the horseman before he had time to intercept the wedding party. However as the roads in Clea at the time were not conducive to swift traveling by any transport our traveler “later to be termed a cyclist” was not able to overtake the horseman and the wedding party had again to be re-routed. As the progeny in the district proves the outcome of this wedding was successful.

As a sequel to the above, in the 1940’s an American lady from California came to this area trying to trace her ancestry in the Keady parish. She had in her possession the diary of her grandfather, a certain Laurence Daly who had been visiting Keady in the 1870’s. One chapter in the diary was headed “A Keady wedding” and the foregoing story was told, also giving the names of the participants.

Tales like the above, tales of runaway weddings, tales of happenings at wakes, the doings or sayings of some character in the district, these were termed a “night’s crack”. When dealing with the older generation care had to be taken not to offend the ethics, the whims, fads or even superstitions of any particular family. Thus in my childhood if you were offered a drink of milk you must say “God bless your cows and the lady (or man) who milks them. If you omitted this and the cow became ill you could sense a lack of friendship and be told of it later. If you met one of the older men going to the fair with cattle you must be sure to say Good morning and good luck. If you entered a byre where the cows were being milked or even met a woman or man coming from the byre after milking it was criminal not to say ‘God bless your work’. In my early youth very often the milk was churned at home. If you entered the house or dairy when churning was in operation no matter what your hurry, it was taboo not to take a turn at the churning if only for a moment. ‘Giving a brache’ this was called. If you met someone on the street or roadway and wished to comment on their health or appearance you had better make no comment if you did not wish them well. Thus you were supposed to say, ‘You are looking well today I wish you your health’.

Back to Top

 Talking about the churning the creamery was something unheard of at the start of this century. As more and more farmers commenced sending their milk to the creamery one old man I knew and often talked with used to say, “Is not it in Columcille’s prophecy - The milk of the parish will all be churned in one churn”. Then he would tell me that the older generation would say, “No matter about Columcille, that is one thing that will never happen”. I have never read the complete prophecies of Columcille, but when I was a boy, a book was in circulation in our district supposed to be the unabridged version of the prophecies. The old people set almost as much stone by it as they did the Bible. Every national event, every parochial happening could be made to be read out of Columcille’s prophecies. At one time in rural dwellings fan bellows were installed; whereby turning a wheel the hearth fire was fanned from underneath. Then would our grandfather say, “It is in the prophecy, they will neither spin or weave yet there will be a wheel in every corner”. Talking about war I have often heard old folk say, “Yes it is in the prophecy, they will fight on land, in the skies, on the sea and under the sea”. I have since heard that the most widely read book about Columcille’s prophecies was written by an eighteenth century school-master for commercial purposes, and that many of the prophecies were figments of this man’s imagination.

Whilst tales of witchcraft and witches have long since stopped being part of the Irish scene, yet in the twenties, or say fifty years ago, certain people (usually innocent) were said to have “the evil eye” or to be capable of bewitching a cow or calf or in some cases even a human. The antidote for this was to procure a small piece of the offending agents clothing and burn it under the affected animal’s nose. I have known an otherwise sensible man walk a couple of miles to clip a piece of the tail of a neighbour’s shirt, as it hung on the washline, because he blamed him for bewitching a calf.

Again, certain people were supposed to have cures: the elder of twins was said to have the cure of the sprain and some people had more belief in this charm than in a doctor, a woman who married someone with the same surname as herself was said to have a cure of the whooping cough, a child born after the death of its father late in life had the cure for an infected mouth. Other cures were passed down from generation to generation such as: the cure for Erysipelas, Whitlow and others. Again, many of the older generation had a knowledge of herbs and could make salves and herbial remedies that were effective for many ailments.

The old sayings of many of these sages were worthy of attention, as with generations of experience to go by, they were often proved right. One belief amongst the older generation being; that if a family flourished financially, about three generations in direct lineal descent were usually the limit of the homestead. Then as one old lady put it, “A family clinging to, the door posts” (that is a family in dire poverty) could not be moved with a crowbar and remained in the one homestead for countless generations. Houses too were said to be lucky or unlucky; blessed and cursed and have their own characteristics.

Back to Top

I am not as a rule given much to superstition, yet there are questions that I cannot answer. For instance: a grand uncle of my own was born in a certain house in the locality in 1846 - that is nearly 120 years ago. My uncle lived to be 95 years – yet, although the house he was born in was continually in occupation, he never remembered a funeral leaving it, moreover he never in his youth knew anyone who remembered a corpse being carried through the portals of that door. (My uncle moved to an adjoining house on his marriage). The same applies to this home to the present day, the families moving out before their last illness or for some other reason. Is it coincidence: or is it that there are more things in heaven and earth than are dreamt of in our philosophy?

As already referred to in these notes, old forts, raths, and such like were said to be the residentiary of the “wee people” and as such to be left alone. I have known a man ask permission from the fairies to cut a bush on a rath when fencing cattle. Superstition! Yes, undoubtably, yet when I was a teenager I went to work as a farm labourer with a certain gentleman in Co. Monaghan. On my second day on the farm he took me to a rath overgrown with blackthorn shrubs. “Now”, he said, “as long as you are working here, never break or cut a bush on this rath”. He said as a boy he had been warned about this but when a fairly old man he disregarded the warning and broke off a branch to chop up for firing the boiler. The first chop he hit the branch with his axe a piece flew up and knocked out one of his eyes. Coincidence? That was told to me in 1931 and the accident happened some years before that. We now live in the enlightened year of 1975. Yet I know for a fact, that old mans grandsons gave that rath a wide berth.

In the early years of this century Mr. X decided to build a new dwelling in Carnagh district. When the foundations were being dug, it was found necessary to dig the corner of an adjoining fort or rath in order to get the house square. The house was completed, but the room built into the fort could not be occupied by reason of furniture being moved about by mysterious happenings, however this room was turned into a store for potatoes. A certain gentleman, still quite mentally alert and about age 60 years ago - a frequent visitor to the house in question, tells that on a certain night a few neighbours were chatting in the kitchen and the din and noise got so loud in the adjoining room, now the potato store, that they could hardly hear themselves speak. The owner, the man who originally had the house built, decided to chastise the fairies so opening the door he sternly demanded to know what the racket was about. Without warning a huge potato struck him on the nose knocking his nose sideways and thus it remained. I have often joked with the gentleman, still hale and hearty, who tells the yarn, but he always retorts: “Dammit man - didn’t I know old Mick - after he got the crack of the potato, his nose was turned like a half moon”. I did not know old Mick, but I do know that the room in question has been cut from the rest of the dwelling. Again - coincidence! - A poltergeist? - Or, again, are there some things in heaven and earth …

Back to Top

In these days of disco, pop music and festivals, rock and roll and many forms of modern entertainment, it is understandably difficult for the present generation of young boys or girls to visualise the kind of life lives by their grandparents. It may seem incredible, yet in my youth, I have known old men and woman who had never traveled in a motorcar or railway train and had lived and died without being outside Co. Armagh - the highlights of their lives being their weekly visit to the nearest market town. Up to the end of the 1920’s it was the custom for the wife of the small farmer to carry her weeks supply of eggs and butter to market, the price obtained for these used to buy the week’s provisions for the family. I can remember eggs being sold at about eight pence per pound. As ten or twelve dozen of eggs was the normal produced for sale and six or eight lbs. of butter each week, the total money involved was about twelve or fifteen shillings. As the price for provisions were equally cheap, it was quite feasible to buy food for a family of eight or nine for considerably less than one pound. Of course in those days the eating habits were of necessity quite abstemious from what we know today. Thus, what was known as “bakers bread” was almost unknown in rural areas. Butchers meat, too, was quite a rarity being only bought at Christmas or sometimes at Easter. In these instances I am referring to the routine customs of the small six or eight acre farm, the standard of living of the larger farmer being regulated by the size of his farm and how much stock he could produce. Then too, a family’s standing in the district was decided by the size of his farm and more commonly by the number of cows kept on the farm. Thus, if a farmer’s son from a farm of say thirty acres and ten cows, married the daughter of a six or eight acre farmer with two cows he was said to have married “beneath him”, the girl in question being said to have done well for herself.

But what was the lot of the labourer in the early years of the century. Well during the years before the 1914-18 war, 10/- per week was the average earnings for a general labourer. How families subsisted then has often been a mystery to me, as one old ladies put it, “It was often a mystery to themselves”. I mentioned earlier the hiring fair, well with the wages so low, is it to be wondered that the elder members of the family had to seek work to supplement the family income and the hiring fair was the only labour market available. As there was no compulsory school-leaving age in those days, or if there was, it was not enforced, it was not uncommon for a youngster of 12 or 13 years to have to go to work.

Back to Top

One other event in our grandfathers or great grandfathers time and commented on by the older generation very often was, as it was referred to “the night of the big wind”. This night of severe wind in 1839 and whilst I never know any who remember it, yet in my youth tales of its severity were prevalent. It seems it struck the Keady area with extreme ferocity, most homes in the area being left roofless. The night of the big wind seems to have been sort of a landmark in the lives and times of the people in the late 19th century. Thus, events were spoken of - as happening before the big wind or after it.  Even a person’s age was calculated with reference to it, as the following anecdote illustrates: A certain lady had two daughters of marriageable age, Mary was three years the senior - an eligible bachelor in the district was seeking a wife and one of the girls in question was selected for him. As Maggie, being the younger and prettier, she was his choice. The girl’s mother, being a lady who believed that first things must come first, gave him several reasons why he must marry Mary. Then as was common, some local wit making a ballad of the event recorded her allusion to the younger girl thus, “As for Maggie - she can wait awhile, She’s still a bit behind, for she was only five years old the night of the big wind.”

As I have stated at the beginning of this narrative, I was asked to record my reminiscences of local folklore, traditional place names and such. I will not vouch for the authenticity of all or any of these writings. I believe them however to be a mixture of fact, fiction and fallacy, but to the writer they have been the folklore, the tales told by the fireside in the homesteads in Keady and Castleblayney areas: also, things seen, heard and noted in my journey through life.

 Having traced my ancestry back to the mid eighteenth century, which is as far back as local records go, and as I write these notes in these days of strife, stress and warring factions, I cannot but be struck by the fact that each of my paternal ancestors who dwelt within these walls must have lived through stirring events which have made history in this unhappy land. My great grandfather must have lived through the 1798 rebellion. My grandfather, born in 1925, lived through the famine years and my father the 1916 uprising and subsequent events. My prayer now is, that if one of my kin, in the future generations may read these lines better times and the peace that God giveth may prevail in Ireland.

And so – When I’m dead and in my grave and all my bones are rotten

If someone reads these lines I won’t be quite forgotten. 

John Keating

2nd December 1975

Back to Top

3.  A BRIEF HISTORY OF THE PARISH OF KEADY AND DERRYNOOSE 

Author Unknown

The Parish takes its name from the Gaelic Doire Innis meaning Oak Island and the first mention of it in a Christian context is in the Feilire Aengus in A. D. 657. The Feilire Aengus is a collection of the lives of Irish Saints in metrical form and it attributed to St. Aengus of Culdee. He was a hermit of the peculiar Irish Order of Monks and Hermits that gradually began to take shape after St. Patrick’s time. It was different from our present day idea of a Religious Order in the sense that it hadn’t a central authority and a fixed rule binding each member; rather it was a gathering of men with a common ideal, i.e. Christian Perfection. They lived in monasteries on semi-eremitical communities founded by different people (St. Columcille at Derry, St. Fintan at Clonenagh, St. Molaise etc.) and observed a Rule or particular way of life written for each community by its founder. They were all similar in that they observed the monastic virtues of Poverty, Chastity, and obedience and were generally known as "Ceile Do" or people who were close to or “together with God”. This name in the course of time Anglicised as Culdees.

According to Feilire Aengus a monk or hermit named Mocua Mac Lonain came to Derrynoose around 625 A.D. Now Mochua, known as St. Mochua was born about 587 A.D. so this would leave him in the region of 60 years old on his arrival in Derrynoose. He built a Hermitage and church where St, Mochua’s Holy well now is, but I believe the ruins in the vicinity of the Holy well are not ruins of this Hermitage, but rather the ruins of Church of Ireland built on the site where Mochua’s Hermitage and Church originally stood. He died in Derrynoose the age of 90and is probably buried in the graveyard adjoining the ruins. Although this is the first specific mention of Derrynoose in a Christian connection, I think it would be quite reasonable to believe that owing to its proximity to Armagh, St. Patrick himself or at least Patrician missionaries had already evangelized the area. Indeed a very old tradition has it that the Tassagh district derives its name from the disciple of St. Patrick. According to this tradition St. Patrick was accompanied to Ireland by (among others) a Roman Priest named Ascissius. He is credited with having founded a Culdee Monastery in the place where the old Tassagh graveyard now is, and this place became known as "Tiehe Assach" or the house of Assac – hence Tassagh. It is also held that this was the same St. Tassach who attended St Patrick on his deathbed. Maybe this is wishful thinking – local patriotism or pride – as you wish, but most of these local traditions bear examination. There’s nearly always a kernel of truth in them.

To return to St. Mochua’s old Church – Derrynoose is mentioned again in the ecclesiastical taxation of Ireland Records of 1302-6 A.D., as having a taxable value of 2 marks 18 pence. Apparently the English King of that period was in some financial distress owing to the drain of the Royal Exchequer due to his wars with France and he asked the pope to allow him a portion of the Ecclesiastical Tax to help defray some of his expenses. There is further mention again in1426 in Primate Swyne’s Register when the Primate appealed for money to restore the Church of St. Mochua, which had fallen into shocking disrepair. It would seem that it was about this time that the Prior and Chapter of the Culdees in Armagh were severely reprimanded by the Primate and a Commission of enquiry for their penuriousness in this matter. It would appear that Derrynoose was one of the parishes whose revenues went toward the upkeep of the Culdee Priory or Chapter in Armagh, and an Erenagh or steward looked after the collection of revenue and the temporal affairs of the 15 townlands of Derrynoose. The Erenagh always came from the family of Mac Eoin or McKeown. The Culdee appointed a chaplain, a secular priest or priests to look after the spiritual needs of the parishioners. In Primate Swyne’s time the remuneration received by the resident priest had fallen so low as to be totally insufficient and a scandal. The Culdee Prior was severely reprimanded and ordered to increase the stipend, which was done, and the church of St. Mochua at Listrakelt was repaired. 

Back to Top

We have a record of a Father Daniel McKeogh P.P. of Derrynoose being ordained by Dr. Mark Forrestal of Kildare in1680: of Hugh Quinn of Tassagh, ordained by Dr. Dominic Burke of Elphin: of Terence O’Neil or O’Neill (Seagahon) by the same prelate in 1690: Rev. Owen Gounley (Carricklane) ordained in 1670 by St. Oliver Plunkett, Primate of Armagh. Dr. Donnelly (Board of Armagh) was P.P. of Derrynoose and Keady around 1686 to 1690.

During the operation of the Penal Laws Mass was celebrated at several still remembered Mass Rocks in different parts of the parish. One was in Lagan on the land of Ambrose O’Hara. Old tradition has it that St. Oliver Plunkett said mass and administered confirmation at the Mass Rock. There was another one just opposite where Mr. James Finnegan lives, near the Keady – Castleblayney Road near where the new Keady Cattle Mart stands.

Even in the early days of the last century Baptisms took place and Marriages were solemnized at a Public House then owned by Mr. Denis Cavanagh on the Keady – Castleblayney Road now owned and operated by Mr. Thomas McKeown. The Parish Priest was on the hill opposite near Clea Lake.

To return to St. Mochua – In the old days there lay a stone beside St. Mochua’s Well. Devotees used it quite properly for kneeling on while praying at the well, but it was also used by the evilly disposed for a more sinister purpose. People wishing to do harm to their neighbours used this stone, known as Leac Mochua, for “praying prayers on” or seeking to bring misfortune by supernatural means on an offending neighbour. So prevalent had this pernicious custom become the late Canon Kelly P.P. had two men from the parish lift the stone and bury it where it would never be found. They were Parra Mor Haughey who lives near the well and Dan McKeown of Curryhughes. Both men went to their reward without ever divulging their secret.

 Still on the subject of the old Hermitage and its surroundings, one Arthur Haughey was setting potatoes in a field near the old graveyard belonging to the Singleton’s and he dug up a large gold crucifix. The Singleton (as I suppose they were entitled to do, since they owned the property) took the crucifix and it is believed they sold it later.

This brings me to another point. In a parish, so ancient, as Derrynoose I cannot understand why there are so few relics of the past in existence. In the county museums in Armagh there are exhibits from all over the county, some dating from the Flint and Bronze Ages, and yet apart from a Yeomanry Uniform of the Tassagh Company, there is nothing from the local area. Even in the townland of Tivenamora, where it is believed one of the great battles over the Cain Bo Cualizne (Brown Bull of Cooley) was fought; not a shield, arrowhead, axe head, sword or skoan was ever unearthed - at least not that I ever heard of. Is it possible that not one memento of over two thousand years of history exists in this parish. Surely thousands of generations of farmers and quarrymen and ploughmen must have found or turned up some objects, large or small, that have a ling with the long past. Perhaps over the years people have found or dug up certain curious objects or artifacts which maybe they have cleaned up and kept as curiosities without realizing their possible historical or cultural value. 

Back to Top

I would appeal to anyone who thinks they have in their possession or in the possession of their family any object or old manuscript or anything which they think might be of value in establishing a link with the distant or comparatively recent past, would they please allow them to be viewed or examined. They might get a pleasant surprise. Personally, I refuse to believe that our only links with the past in Keady or Derrynoose are: the Standing Stone in Mullyard, St. Mochua’s graveyard where the saint is buried, the Holy Well, Parra Mor Haughey’s gold crucifix, and Culdee graveyard at Tassagh where tradition says St. Ascissius is buried. By the way while I am referring to Tassagh and relics of the past I should mention that when a grave was being opened in the Culdee graveyard, a gold ring with a large emerald - richly set - was turned up. That was in 1824. It was suggested that the ring may have belonged to one of the old abbots of the monastery there. No trace of the ring now exists. I am afraid that a very valuable historical link with an old respected family who lived in Keady has been irretrievably lost.  I refer to a document that was in the possession of, and was greatly prized as a family heirloom, by the late John Dobbin. An ancestor of the Dobbin’s was made Colonel – on – the – field for exceptional personal bravery by King William at the Battle of Boyne 1690. The commission bearing the King’s signature to the appointment was passed down on the Dobbin Family through the generations till John Dobbin’s time. John and I were personal friends and he invited me one day to the little house in Newholland in which he then lived, to view it. I was unable to go on that particular day and so lost a golden opportunity of seeing it, however I checked with Rev. Canon Love on the matter. In fact it was he who officiated at his funeral. Canon Love assures me that he saw the commission and the basket, in which it was kept, and in fact he urged Mr. Dobbin to allow him to have the MS for safets in the Rectory safe, but John would not part with it. Canon Love later left Keady for another appointment and lost contact. Up till now all efforts to trace the document have proved fruitless. Any information leading to its whereabouts would be welcome.

The great Irish Family of O’Neill had close associations with Derrynoose. They entered this part of Armagh via the Caledon area and played a leading part among the native populations in Derrynoose for generations. The O’Neill of Derrynoose was among the heads of the native great families outlawed and dispossessed after the Williamite War. This branch of the O’Neill were descended from the main family and were Kin to Con Bacach (Con the Lame) an Uncle Sean the Proud. Some families still resident in Derrynoose can still trace descent from this powerful clan. Father Raymond Murray CC of Armagh in a lecture in St. Patrick's Hall Keady dealt exhaustively with this subject and several articles in Seannachus Ard Macha covered this ground also, so there is very little I can add.

Another family of Planter stock left their imprint on this area too and merit mention. The Maxwells family came from Scotland during the reign of James VI in the person of Rev. Robert Maxwell. Elizabeth I was on the English throne at this time and by her favour the Rev. Robert was appointed Dean of Armagh. About this time the first Church of Ireland Church was built in Derrynoose on the site of St. Mochua’s church about 1622, and 300 acres of land in demesne was granted to the Maxwells in 1612, so between his Deanery, the revenues of Derrynoose – Tynan Parish and the grant of land one could say he was getting off to a reasonably good start. (Derrynoose and Tynan Parish were one until 1709 when they were erected as separate parishes and a church was built in Madden in 1713 to serve as the Parish Church of Derrynoose C of I parish)

Back to Top

Now the Maxwells appear to have resided mostly about Tynan and there they intermarried with the family named as Close and were known thereforwared as Maxwell-Close. Apparently too they built a castle or stronghold in the Madden district at Knockraven. This stood on land now owned by Mr. Henry Stewart of Knockraven. He told me that the house in which he now lives was built with the stone which came from the ruins of the old castle. In fact the threshold stone at his door came from a doorway of the old castle.

The Maxwell-Close family whose head was now and for quite some time known as Lord Farnham lived mostly in the Tynan area and do not appear to have used their stronghold at Knockraven as a permanent residence. Mr. Stewart tells me that a Mr King once lived there and was at one time a Bailsman for the priest of Derrynoose. This priest was said to have lived “about Curryhughes”.  I made some enquiries and between that and a reference to the writings of the tale Fr. Michael McDermott I discovered that there was a Father Sheils (known to the authorities as “Priest Sheils) who lived in Carnagh, which adjoins Curryhughes. This Father Shiels appears to have been a very saintly man and was regarded by his people as having great healing powers. A well, which he used, was often frequented after his death by the devout, who believed its water, when prayerfully used, had a beneficial effect on handicapped children. I haven’t been able to locate this well, as the older generations are gone to their reward. Not far from Knockraven Castle there was until recently years an old rath or fort or earthwork, referred to locally as a “Fairy Fort”. It must have had some significance in days long gone. The owner of the land Mr. Agnew must have considered it a waste of good land and so with the best intentions and possibly in the interest of good husbandry he had the fort leveled.

The road that passes through Knockraven is, according to local tradition, the highway that was used by St. Malachy in his journeys to the Derrynoose area and was undoubtedly one of the old highways into and out of Armagh. The Farnham family although they had property in the Madden area do not seem to have made a lasting impact on the district, and some time later they left the Armagh scene altogether - and the present Lord Farnham resides in Kilmore, Co. Cavan. There was only one industry however with which they were connected - they were the main shareholders in the old Lead Mines at Curryhughes and in other parts of the Derrynoose area. Their mines, which were worked from about 1800-1830, produced a very good standard of lead, but as they progressed further and deeper it was found that the seam did not come up to expectation - the cost of pumping equipment, the falling yield, and high transport costs finally brought about the closure of the mines around 1830. The old mine workings can still be seen in the glen at Curryhughes and the old shafts are known by the rather romantic name of “Tory Holes” - recalling memories of the Raparees.

The name of the various Townlands of Derrynoose remind one of the old Gaelic past and are rich in descriptiveness and in history. I will mention but a few – Tivenamara (Taobh na Mairbh) the hill of the dead, Drumnahavil – (Drum na h-ubhail) the hill of the apple tree, Crossdall (Cros Doill) the blind man’s cross, Carlglisgarran (Carrraig Lios Garran) the rock fort of the horses, Lislea (Lios Lavich) the Warrior’s fort (or the grey fort), etc. Now for the most mangled angliscisation of them all, “the Man o’ War”: It has nothing whatever to do with battleships, cruisers, sloops, or men of war – It in fact has the rather prosaic meaning of; the middle road (Meadhon Bhothar) – it was the road running up the centre of the hill. To further add to the confusion – this took it’s name from the road - instead of the other way round, making one think of the old trick question – which came first? - In this case of course it must have been the hill.

Back to Top

Gaelic was spoken as an everyday language in Derrynoose up to 120 years ago for I remember my mother telling me that her father told her that he knew a old woman named White (whether this was her married or maiden name, I do not know). This old lady knew practically no English. I would take this to meant hat her parents spoke Irish in their home and this would have been usual in the families of their generation. This much I do know: that in my boyhood several Gaelic expressions were in daily use. The country people still called the market day preceding Christmas – “the Margey More” (Mairge Mor) Big Market. A left-handed person was called a “Cither paw” (Ciotair), a young boy was invariably a “Gasson” (Garsun), a hairless cow - was a “Moily” (Maol = Bald); “Avick” (A Maic = son!) - was still common, and when people were calling their cattle in: they used, and still use, the Irish call “Check, Check” (Teich, Teich = come, come); added names like: “Bawn” (White), Roe (Red), and Mor (Big or Great) - like Mor Haughey who found the gold crucifix near St. Mochua’s Well. There are bound to be many more examples of this, which the old people will remember. 

If anyone can remember old customs, folklore, or even the old superstitions that survived up till 50 or 60 years ago – we, at the Historical Society, would be grateful to hear them and record them before they are lost forever

The great O’Neills of Derrynoose were attainted after the Williamite Wars, but a couple of members of the family who went to France continued to shed glory on the family and on Derrynoose by their notable achievements in the Church and in the French Army, right up to the middle of the last century. This, as I said, has been adequately dealt with by Father Murray and in Seannacus Ard Macha.   

Back to Top

 
SOME HOMELY NOTES

When I was a boy, I remember the old people putting May flowers around the byres and stables to keep away bad luck: and belief in fairies was still fairly general. No one, or very few of course, would openly admit to this, but all the same, there were quite a number of things these same people wouldn’t do through fear of offending the “wee people” – Like cutting down a fairy thorn. The Banshee was even more widely believed in – in fact it was a cause of secret pride, to some families, to have a Banshee follow them; it was taken as a sign that they were of “Old Gaelic” stock.

Canon Kelly, whose revered remains lie beside the gate of the Church in Listrakelt, is still spoken of with affection by many of the old generation, and in my younger days; was still a very vivid memory to the old generation of those days. Many are the anecdotes, some of them rather witty that are told of him – apparently, he didn’t like a lot of coughing when he preached and did not disguise his irritation when it happened. On one occasion a prominent parishioner felt an attack coming on, he made giant efforts to stifle to no avail, in desperation he grabbed his hat and jammed it over his mouth – the results were disastrous. The Canon stopped for a full two minutes, and then looking severely at the unfortunate offender, he said, “Put away your hat ___ (mentioning the man’s nickname) your old stifle of coughing was certainly better that”. It is told of him, that he always had a pot of oatmeal porridge near the fire, and if a traveller of the roads called for alms, the Canon would invite him or her in: the porridge was warmed and the guest was given a creepy stool to sit on. When the meal was hot, His Reverence, would take the pot off and set it on the floor in front of the traveller and give him a bowl of milk and a big spoon – pulling over another creepy and armed with milk and spoon he, himself, sat opposite and ate and chatted away with his new friend - thus fulfilling the wish if Christ, “I was hungry and you fed me”. When the traveller went, even if he hadn’t a heavy pocket, at least he had a full belly – with of course the added distinction of being able to tell his friends he had dined with the Parish Priest.

His housekeeper was a cousin of his; named Judy Kelly, and he kept a little terror, called punch. This combination of names was a cause of some innocent amusement to his friends, both clerical and lay, who referred jokingly to “The Canon’s Punch and Judy”.

Another little bit of interesting information I picked up: McLysaght states in his “Irish Families” - that “All the Vallely families living in Ballymire, Derrynoose, Lisnadill, and Kilclooney have one thing in common – red or sandy hair. This should be of interest to anyone in the Derrynoose area.  

Back to Top

Derrynoose always had its creditable quota of minor poets and song writers, as well as good singers. I understand there is now a body of enthusiasts in the area collecting these old songs and poems. I wish them every success, for this too is a vital part of the history, folklore and culture of the Parish and should be carefully preserved.

Since making my appeal for information about the existence of artifacts: Mr. Henry Steward of Knockraven has told me, that when ploughing some years ago, he turned up a stone age axe and two other flints. He presented them to the late Patrick Murphy, of Bachelor’s Walk, and they are now in possession of Mr. And Mrs. Malachy Murphy of the same address.  

Up until a century ago, the normal way of arranging marriages was the old custom of matchmaking. This was prevalent all over Ireland and the amazing thing: is that the majority of these unions were a lasting success, despite the disparity of age - in many cases, between the partners. One side effect of this custom was: the disappearance of many very small holdings, as farms became amalgamated through marriage.

Paedar Livingstone mentions in his book “The Monaghan Story” – that “Hugh O’Neill attacked the Queen’s (Elizabeth I) Marshall, Sir Henry Bagenal, on his way to relieve the Monaghan Garrison at Crossdall between Keady and Monaghan, but they got through to Monaghan”. This was 27th May 1595.

The same writer states: “One of the McMahon novles, Brian, brother of the executed Red Hugh went into rebellion and was killed at Cargaghugh in Armagh on 13 march 1608”.  Would this Cargaghugh be Curryhughes in the Derrynoose area? This Townland (Curryhughes) is also spelled Curryhugh in the old cess and Rate books for 1864.

 Back to Top
Patron Saints of the Parish of Derrynoose 

The ancient church of the parish was situated in the Townland of Listrakelt, where the ruins still remain. The old graveyard, which surrounds it, is perfectly circular in form thus evidencing its Celtic or Pre-Cleric origin. About forty yards distance from the graveyard and towards the north east, is the Holy Well, to which the names of the patron Saints have clung, right down through the ages, to the present day Mochuac agus Mocholmoe.
Oral Traditions

James Bennet of Doohat, both of whose parents were Irish speakers, always heard them refer to the Holy Well as: “Tobar Mochoa agus Mocholema” (Toban MoChusac sup CoChomnn-oe).

Mrs. Patrick Kelly (nee Haughey), on whose father’s farm the well is situated, had a considerable amount of lore concerning the Saint’s cures at the well, etc. - always heard it called “Toban MoChuac”. Also, she had much to tell about “Lesc MoChuac” (the flagstone of MoChuac) – “The Saints cursing stone”, “The station at MoChuac’s well”, etc.

Mary Anne MacAteer was reared from her infancy by her grandmother, Mrs. Mary Muarry of Crossbane - a native Irish speaker. She remembers on one occasion speaking to her grandmother about going to “St. Malachy’s Well” for a cure. The old woman, Mary Muarry, corrected her saying that the proper name was “St. Mochuac’s Well”, not St. Malachy’s.

Other people still living in the district heard the older people call the well: “St. MoChuac’s”.

The name: “St. Malachy’s Well” appears to be quite recent. 

 Back to Top

4. KEADY - By an unknown author

The name Keady is of Gaelic origin and several suggestions have been made as to its meaning i.e. “The Meeting Place” is one name given, “The Place of The Little Hills” is another and I would expect that both of these efforts have something said in their favour so I won’t prolong the argument about it.

He would be a bold man who would put an exact date on when Keady as a particular locality began. The earliest reference to Keady that I could find is in a letter from a “Symin Richardson of Keady Co. Armagh” to Provost Steele of Trinity College, Dublin and dated April 18th 1674. This would seem to establish that Keady was a definite locality as distinct from the four townlands on which it stands as early as the 1670’s. This letter with quite a number of others concerning Keady is preserved in the Manuscript Room in Trinity College, Dublin and was kindly shown to a party from Keady Historical by Mr. Refausse while on a visit to Dublin in 1980.

Trinity College received a large grant of lands on Co. Armagh, about 15 square miles extending over Keady, Middleton and Armagh areas. Evidence of this still exists in some of the place names i.e. Yellow's Hall in Middleton district and Collegeland near Armagh. As Trinity appears to have been the major land owning body in this part of the country, it seems logical that material for further exploration must exist for old land grants, the names of previous holders of this land, why they were dispossessed etc. The subject, the possibilities open is limitless if only one had the money and time to do the research. Maybe some enterprising member of our Historical Society in the future will pursue this search of the past if we can sufficiently whet his appetite or hers as the case may be.

In the meantime we can exploit such data as we have. For the start we will have noticed that Keady grew around a crossroads, but this was no ordinary crossroads, no it was a centre place linking four main garrison towns in the area; Armagh, Monaghan, Mountnorris and Castleblayney.

Troops and supplies were regularly to-ing and fro-ing between these garrisons and they all came sooner or later to the crossroads. In those days horses carried supplies and the officers and of course the rank and file marched. Now horses have a habit of wearing down shoes, and shoes have a habit of losing nails now and again. What more natural than that one or two blacksmiths should set up a shop near the highway so well trodden? But shoes require nails and so a few nail makers (for then nails were made by hand) found an outlet for their skill.  Why not build a house and settle down at this busy crossroads. Soldiers after a long and tiring march, perhaps in scorching weather need, indeed deserve a drink, and who can fill this need better than an innkeeper. A reputable innkeeper would see to the feeding and grooming of your horses while you were being refreshed, and so would need a few grooms. A growing community needs to be fed and this was supplied no doubt by a couple of bakers. This last assumption appears to be supported by something more than pure supposition, in fact it is documented for the letter of Symon Richardson to Provost Steele of Trinity College asks if some arrears which are owed to the college, might be paid in bread and beer. Provost Steele it would seem agreed to this proposal for a letter of slightly later date records that the Provost was reformanded by the trustees for agreeing to this arrangement without their consent. The whole transaction would seem to show that both these commodities were in plentiful supply in the little settlement.

Well, what do we have now? A little hamlet at a fairy busy and strategically useful crossroads with let’s say about twenty or more houses, one or two innkeepers, a variety of tradesman, blacksmiths, bakers, nailers, probably and enterprising grocer or two, inevitably a draper, and of course a shoemaker and a carpenter. As the place showed signs of having a future, a mason goes without saying and of course all the labourers that would be required for all this multifarious unskilled chores that needed to be done daily. Keady, this little settled hamlet had another very useful attraction. It had a limitless supply of water for both man and beast. Six spring wells within easy walking distance in fact within minutes walking distance, good sparkling cold spring water. Rivers everywhere, lakes in the hills to the south: Clea Lake, Gentle Owen’s, Tullynawood etc. These lakes and the tremendous driving power of their waters were to be a decisive factor in the more rapid growth and prosperity of Keady in the years ahead, but more of that later.

Back to Top

II

Keady is located in the Fews district of Co. Armagh and around the middle of the Sixteenth Century an event happened which was to have a lasting effect on the future of the whole South Armagh area. The O’Neill family of Tyrone as we have already seen were was strongly established in the Derrynoose area of the parish. They were the main stem of the clan, descendants of Conn Becach. In or around 1545 a Chief of a cadet branch of this great family, Owen Mac Hugh O’Neill, invaded the Fews. He came in what is now Middletown through Madden, into the placer now known as Keady and then seems to have veered towards Newtownhamilton and the Newry, Crossmaglen, and Creggan districts. Owen Mac Hugh seems to have left his mark on the Fews. He had nine sons and their passing and presence is still seen in the route of their conquest both in family and place names. Two of his sons particularly interest us in the Madden and Keady districts. The latter, Cairbre, seems to have settled around where Keady now stands, for a Townland on the outskirts of the town bears his name Rathcarberry (Cairbre’s Fortress) and the name Carberry is strong, and in days gone by was even more numerous in the parish. The other son,          , or as it is anglicized: Hugh, is even more strongly represented in the very prolific name and family of Hughes. So numerous are the families of Hughes’s in the Madden, Middletown and Keady areas that it became necessary to distinguish the different families by giving them added names or nicknames to pinpoint the particular family or individual.  To complicate this complication still more another factor was added: John, seems to be a favourite Christian name among the Hughes clan and if you said the name “John Hughes” you could have been referring to possibly four or five men in the radius of two miles. This conferring of nicknames wasn’t merely an uncharitable exercise, it was a veritable necessity. Then there are the families of O’Hea and Hayes from the same source (at least in the lower Fews) and McShane too betrays an O’Neill origin. Before we leave this subject we must note that the redoubtable Owen Mac Hugh himself is remembered in the name of Keady’s main street “Kinelowen St.” (Cinel gofn: seed of the descendants of Owen) which would suggest that a sizeable number of his people settled there, thus giving the district the name. One thing though I’ve noticed; no tradition locally seems to point to the resting places of these great O’Neills, although they must have been powerful men in their area of influence in their day. They were in all probability outlawed with their cousins the O’Neill of Derrynoose and the O’Neills of Tullyglush, and the chief of the clan may have gone to places where they could make a longer stand, such as the mountainous areas of South Armagh. Some of them may lie with their kinsmen in the O’Neill graves of Creggan. Some may have gone in the armies of France, Spain or Austria with the Wild Geese.

We in the Keady Historical Society do not claim to know all there is about the parish. We depend on local traditions, the memories of old people etc. and if anyone knows anything about the later fortunes of the O’Neills of the Fews , especially those of Keady or Madden, this information would be greatly appreciated, in fact their membership in the Society would be warmly welcome.

Back to Top

III

After this digression to cover Owen Mac Hugh’s invasion of the Fews, we return again to the growing village of Keady which was growing apace. Other members of the Society in their contributions will put flesh and clothe the mere skeleton of the main facts which I am recording about the growth of Keady and some of the great characters who left their mark on it.

Regarding the religious life of the people of all denominations in the town during the 18th and 19th century I am indebted to the late Master Tom Conlon N.T. who was an unfailing source of information on this and many other matters of local interest. His passing will leave a void that will not easily be filled. In my narrative I will often quote him verbatim.

The “Old Chapel” 1786 is described in an old print of the period as a plain cruciform edifice it stood in an old graveyard. The entrance, being near the late Jack Campbell’s premises on Main St., is now Laurence Nugent’s Public House. It has long since been replaced by the fine and spacious Church of St. Patrick, built in 1860. Previous to the building of the “Old Chapel,” mass was celebrated beside a well, still known as the “Altar Well,” a short distance from where the old gas works once stood. A very rocky ledge served as an altar. (Mr. Conlon)

Mr. Henry Dobbin, Rathcarberry House writes: “When I was a boy an old man showed me where the priest stood, and told me that when he was a boy, his father brought him there one day and pointed out the spot where a generation before, he himself, as a boy, had served mass.”

This is the Mass Rock and Well that I mentioned earlier as being just off the Keady-Castleblayney Road, opposite James Finnegan’s. Those were the many long years of the Penal Laws.  

The names of the Parish Priest of the parish are listed as registered at the General Session of the Peace, held at Lurgan, in and for the said County of Armagh, the tenth day of July 1704 we find: Hugh Quinn, Tassagh, aged 49, ordained 1670; Daniel Mac Keogh, Cavagh (Carnagh), aged 51 years, ordained 1670; and of course, Dr. Donnelly (Bard of Armagh), parish priest of Derrynoose and Keady 1686-1690, approximately.

In those days the Catholic Primate was not allowed to go any nearer to his primatial city than O’Toole’s public house in Ballymacnab, so said Cardinal Logue on May 4, 1917 at Conformation when visiting the Deanery. (Mr. Conlon)    

Before we leave the subject of churches, I’m told that two houses in Keady, one that is occupied at present by Mr. Reuben O’Neill on Kinelowen Street and, two, the Off Linence next door, were built from the stones that came from the “Old Chapel” in the graveyard.

The last years of the 18th century were years of great political ferment in Europe. The rallying cry of the French Revolution: Liberty, Equality, Fraternity, found a ready echo among many oppressed peoples of Ireland with their long history of Repression and Coercion did not escape. The success of the French, sans culottes, in their fight against the autocratic Monarchy and hated obligancy, heartened the empovered Irish proletariat and even the underprivileged Presbyterian population.  The result was the birth of the United Irish Movement, in which all depressed classes, Catholic and Dissenter, Native and Planter, pledged themselves to fight injustice, even by force of arms if all else failed. This sense of discontent and revolt penetrated even to Keady and was rife amongst the poorly paid laboring element and the Weavers. Yes, the Weavers, for even in these early days quite a number of people were quite adept Hand Loom Weavers and plied their trade in their own homes, long before the advent of the Big Mills. Local societies of United Men were set up, even where and doubtless, there was one in Keady too.

Back to Top

The Presbyterian Congregation was established in Keady in the beginning of the 18th Century and its first minister was the Rev. Thomas Milliken, ordained by the Presbytery of Armagh, December 17, 1706. Things went smoothly and in good order through the pastorate of several ministers until 1798 when the Presbytery of Monaghan installed the Rev. Henry McIlreed. His installation was opposed by a minority of the congregation and this minority was erected into a separate congregation, Keady 2nd. This new congregation, Keady 2nd, gave a call to the Reverend William Steele then Minister of Portaferry, Co. Down. I could not do justice to this remarkable man in a few trite comments and so I leave to the abler pen of Mr. Noel McEntee to deal more fully with the life, work and achievements of this very great man in an article contributing to this History of Keady. In this article Mr. McEntee will reveal where Dr. Dickson’s Manse stood and may other interesting facts about this great Irishman.

 In 1815 Dr. Dickson resigned, it was said through infirmity and later joined the Presbytery of Bangor and was succeeded by Rev. Joseph Jenkins. Owing to infirmity, Mr. Jenkins was given an assistant, the Rev. George Steen, who was ordained on Nov. 9th 1854 as assistant and successor to Mr. Jenkins. Rev. Mr. Steen was a greatly respected figure in the town and his selflessness and great charity to the poor was still being spoken of by the older generation when I was a boy. Dr. Eric Dorman, of Willowbrook, is a grandson to this same Mr. Steen.

Keady 2nd Congregation did not receive the Regnum Donum, popularly known as Queen Ann’s Bounty until the year 1815. Steele Dickson built a meeting house on a street which later became Meeting Street (the present Davis St.) and the present edifice was built with the help of the late William Kirk at a cost of £1,000. Keady’s 1st congregation still worship in what was known as the Temple Meeting House.

The Church of Ireland Parish of Keady was formed out of Derrynoose by Orders in Council, May 7th 1773. Another Order in Council united another part of Derrynoose to it on 12th August 1780 and on October 12th 1773 Trinity College made a grant to a piece of land, 1 acre-0 roods-38 perches, as a site for a church and burial ground. Later on a Tower was added. The Parish has since lost three townlands to Armaghbrague when that Parish was erected in 1833.

The first Rector of Keady Church of Ireland parish was the Rev. Samuel Close, a member of the Maxwell-Close family I mentioned before. Canon Love a former Rector of Keady Parish managed to recover an etching of the reverend gentleman and it now hangs in the Church Vestry. Keady had many illustrious Rectors and one within my own memory was the Rev. Mathew Banks-Hogg. Canon Hogg was held in deepest respect by all classes and creeds in the area for his open-handed generosity and his charity to the poor and needy irrespective of class or creed. His funeral was one of the biggest and most representative held in Keady for years.

The formation of a separate Church of Ireland Parish and the erection of a new Catholic Church point to one fact, Keady was growing and growing fast. The population in 1831 was 896, in 1841 it was 1,120. Houses 217. That is a far cry from the mid 1670’s.

Back to Top

Keady came to the notice as a centre with possibilities in the mid and later part of the nineteenth century when men who were interested in the development of the linen industry visited the area. When they saw the lakes in the hills above town to the south they realised the immense power lying there awaiting to be harnessed to industry, and that for a comparatively small outlay in building dams or ramparts and sluices for conserving or controlling the waters they could have limitless power for practically nothing. Spinning and beetling mills sprang up all over the area, at Newholland, near Linnenvale, Dundrum, Annvale and Greenmount to mention a few. Mansions for the rising captains industry rose all round Glenvale, Lakeview, Dundrum, Willowbank, Rockmount, Millview, Mountain Lodge and Darkley, etc. In addition to those in the mills and bleachgreens the Big Houses needed gardeners, coachman, cooks, etc. Life was Spartan – like for the workers, wages were very small, the hours were long and the work arduous, but they had always been used to toil and weariness with little return. Life was simpler then and their wants were few.

Apparently the linen businesses kept well abreast of developments in the industry and we are told that Messrs. Sadler of Leeds who operated in the Dundrum Mills were the first firm to make linen from mill spun yarn.

In those days one could be in bed in the early morning and listen to the busy chatter and songs of the mill girls on their way to work in Annvale and Keady Mills. The long strips of linen spread out in the sun at Greenmount and Dundrum were a glory to see. The music of the old water wheels and the rhythm of the beetling mills strung along the banks of the Callan to Milford, Umgola and Armagh soothed one into the cozy belief that this would last forever. The farmers were making money on their flax and the whirr of the Scutch mills was music to their ears.

This was during the Word War One, and aircraft firms were using quite a lot of linen for the fuselages and main planes and people thought that linen was the only fabric that could ever be used. After the War the demand eased. Plane makers discovered alumiium alloys were almost as light and far more durable and even for domestic use linen could be replaced by other and cheaper fabrics. The linen boom was over. Factory after factory closed down. Being an expert weaver, doffer, cloth-passer or mill tenter no longer counted. The depression spread and Keady was finished as a great linen centre. Darkley under very good management struggled on for another few years but the end had come, the big linen market was over.

Sad to relate however the middle of this century was a disastrous period for Ireland. Those were the Famine Years. The vast bulk of the peasantry lived, or it might be more exact to say existed on miserable, uneconomic smallholdings. Potatoes were the main and quite often the only crop. They knew nothing about crop rotation, could not afford to give the land a rest and did not understand that the soil itself needed nourishment. On this section of the population, the most empoverished in Europe, the blow fell mercilessly. They knew little of cereal crops and so when the potatoes failed it was for them the end. They died in coffin ships that were to take them to America and also in their mud cabins, in the ditches and on the roadside, by the thousand. Thousands went to England and Scotland and worked for slave wages in the mines and Satanis mills. When the famine years were over the population of Ireland had slumped from 8,000,000 to about 4,000,000. An English newspaper gloatingly announced that “a Celt on the Banks of the Shannon was the same as Indian on the banks of the Delaware.”

Keady and its envirous did not entirely escape their share of this terrible visitation. Very strangely indeed local tradition is almost silent about the Famine, maybe because it was one of those terrible misfortunes which we wish to forget, but that Keady too had its share we have ample evidence.

Before St. Mary’s Boy’s Primary School was built there stood on that ground a Technical School but it always wasn’t a “Tec”. The older folk always called it the “Fever Hospital” and that indeed was the purpose for which it was originally built. During the Famine it was used as a temporary workhouse (to relieve immediate distress) and as a hospital for the Famine fever victims. It was sometimes called Leeper’s Hospital, after Dr. Leeper who was for some time the doctor in charge. The fact that it was found necessary to erect another if smaller hospital on the site where Mr. McSorley now lives at Iskeymeadow to cater for those whom the Keady Hospital couldn’t accommodate, would seem  to suggest that the area had been pretty severely affected. There is a hill in the Croskey district, locally known as Skull Hill and the story of how it got that name would seem to lead to the same conclusion. It would appear that people were dying in alarming numbers and the local people feared the Fever was spreading and gripped with this fear some people objected to burial of Fever victims in some of the local cemetries. We, living in a happier age are not in a position to judge or condemn, for we cannot appreciate the terrible position these poor people were in. It was said that even the air was foul with the smell of rotting and diseased vegetation in the ground. At that time a much respected quaker family lived in the area on a property known as Daisy Hill. Mr. Dunlop, the then head of the family at that time owned the land on which Skull Hill is situated and he very generously offered a plot for burial of these poor souls. May God reward him. That is how the hill got its name and it stands as a terrible reminder of a national tragedy. A more scientific method of farming and larger holdings with varied products will hopefully avert a similar calamity occurring please God.

Back to Top

Education seems to have had fairly high priority in those days, believe it or not, there were 13 schools in Keady, “3 daily schools and 10 other daily schools, some assisted by the Society for Discountenancing Vice, some by the London Hibernian Society, two by Kildare St. Society, one female school for Higher Classes and a proporietary school for Classics and Mathematics. In 1840 the National Board had schools at Keady and Carraban and gave £73-10-0 for erection of a secondary school in Keady.”

Keady National School in Chapel Street was opened in 1855 and was taught by Mr. Edward Quinn. Mr. Quinn was also clerk to the Town Commissioners (established 1862) and he died in 1894. A Mr. Fox and Mr. Blaney Rice (as son of Blaney Rice the notable  Nationalist leader) were teachers there until the coming of the De La Salle Brothers in 1896.

The Town Hall or at it was affectionately know “The Market House” was built in 1870 under the rule of the Town Commissioners. It is a pity that so many of the younger generation will not remember it for it was certainly an imposing structure for a small town. Several photographs of it are still about and in the Linenhall Library in Belfast in a book about notable buildings; there is a very good photograph and a note about its type of architecture. Apparently it had a Dutch flavour and was the tipical Markthaws. The Monument was built in (unk.) to honour the memory of William Kirk who was M.P. for the area and the outstanding linen manufacturer in the district.

Back to Top

 Around the end of the last century and for about the first quarter of the present century tailoring was having a boom time in Keady.  It is reckoned that there were at one time 120 tailors in and around Keady. Great Drapery and Tailoring firms like Watters and Smyth, Lenagh and Comiskey, O’Hare and Carberry, and Bernard Fegan were doing a brisk business all over Ireland. It is said that some of these firms had between them almost a monopoly for making R.I.C. uniforms and of course many of these men took the opportunity of placing an order for a civilian outfit as well. The owners of these firms (all of whom I knew personally) were very sociable, friendly type, were their own “commercial travelers” and you can imagine how this attracted potential custom and establish in many cases a personal and lasting relationship. But alas! the Great Depression of the Thirties laid its dead hand on this thriving business too, that and the partition of Ireland and the closing of many Northern Ireland products from the (at that time) Irish Free State practically put the finish to Keady as a thriving town. With the setting up of the border and loss to Keady of quite a bit of its hinterland in part of County Monaghan, the monthly fairs became less important and less well attended. This was a severe blow to the business community for on Fair Days there was always a bit of extra money floating around which was good for the shops.

There was another kind of Fair held twice a year in Keady (as in many other towns all over Ireland) which always left a bad taste in my mouth in which the livestock on view were human beings - The Hiring Fairs -. They always put me in mind of a Roman Slave Market. Because I feel that way about it I will not write any further on the subject but you will read further on a very well written and vivid account on this side of our history by my good friend John Keating.

Another event happened around the start of the century which had many profound effects on many kinds of the social, business, and I think the cultural life of Keady. This event was the making of the Keady-Armagh and Keady-Castleblayney Branches of the Great Northern Railway. This brought, apart from the material and business benefits, a great influx of new families, new blood and new and enlarged ideas into what had hitherto been a close-knit and to some extent an isolated community. Many of these families with their varied skills and outlook stayed on, intermarried, became completely assimilated and gave great service to the town of their adoption.

Trains began running on this line in (blank) and was of great benefit to the business and all sectors of the community and opened up the town to a wider world but sad to say after all this outlay of labour and money this venture did not even last for a half of century. Many factors contributed to this failure, among them the Great Depression of the 1930’s with the consequent fall in freight carriage, the advent of buses with their greater convenience for country passengers and of course again the Partition of the country eventually had its effects on the Keady-Castleblayney section, by the 1940’s grass was growing on the railway tracks.

One local venture however has succeeded in holding its own in spite of all the vicissitudes and is still in a healthy trading position until the present day; I refer to the Keady steam bakery. It opened its doors in 1911 and weathered all the storms, two world wars, the Depression, the closing of the Border, the Bread War of the mid 30’s and continues to give, as it did in the past, a fair amount of local employment commensurate with its size to bakers, breadservers, clerks, and carriers as in the earlier days it also gave to yardmen, carpenters and blacksmiths.

Another family firm certainly deserves mention if only for the perfection of its craftsmanship, the firm of Robert O’Neill & Sons Coachbuilders. In the days of pony and trap and the side car and the old horse brakes they did a brisk trade and made a good living for in those days the possession of a pony and trap indicated a certain amount of gentility. The advent of the motor car put paid to this fine craft. They carried on business in the premises now occupied by Murray’s Contractors at the bottom of Kinelowen St.  

Back to Top

Patron Saints of the Parish of Derrynoose

The ancient church of the parish was situated in the townland of Listrakelt where the ruins still remain. The old graveyard which surrounds it is perfectly circular in form thus evidencing its Celtic or Pre-Celtic origin. About forty yards distant from the graveyard and towards the north-east is the Holy Well to which names of the Patron Saints have clung right down through the ages to the present day.

Mochuac agus Mocholmoe.

Oral Tradition

James Bennet of Doohat both of whose parents were Irish speakers always heard them refer to the Holy Well as “Toban Mochua agus Mocholema (Toban MoChusac sup CoChomnn-oe).

Mrs. Patrick Kelly (nee Haughey) on whose father’s farm the well is situated had a considerable amount of lore concerning the Saint cures at the well, etc., always heard it called Toban MoChuac. Also she had much to tell about Lesc MoChuac (the flagstone of MoChuac) “The Saints’s cursing stone” “the station at MoChuac’s well”, etc.

Mary Anne MacAteer was reared from her infancy by her grandmother Mrs. Mary Muarry of Crosbane, a native Irish speaker, She remembers on one occasion speaking to her grandmother about going to ‘St. Malachy’s well for a cure.” The old woman, Mary Muarry, corrected her saying that the proper name was St. Mochuac’s well not St. Malachy’s.

Other people still living in the district heard the older people call the well St. MoChuac’s.

The name St. Malachy’s Well appears to be quite recent.

Back to Top

5. Translation of Names of some local Townlands and places.

Carrickaduff: The Black Rocks (Carriage Dubh)

Curryhughes: Hugli’s Playground - plateau or plain

Caramoyle: The Bare Rock (Carraig Maol)

Crossbane: White Cross (Cros Ban)

Crossmore: Big Cross (Cros Mo’r)

Crossdall: Blind Man’s Cross (Cros Daill)

Crossnamoyle: Bald Ones – Tonsured - Cross (Cros na Maoil)

Carnagh: The Crooked Bridge (Cann Atha)

??          : Probably takes its name from a Cairn or Burial Place

??          : The Cone topped hill

?Drumderg?       : The Red Hill (Drunn Dearg)

?Drumnahavil?       : Hill of the Apples (Drum na Uabhail

?Man O War?       : The Middle Road (Meadhan Bother)

?Tivenamara?       : The Hillside of the Dead (Taobh na Mairbb)

?Iskeymeadow? : The water (or Holy Well) of St. Madoch

Rathcarberry: Carbrey’s Fort or stronghold, Cairtre, a son of Owen Mac Hugh O’ Neill of the Fews

Kinelowen St. (Keady): The seed or generation of the above named Owen McHugh O’Neill (invaded the Fews area 1540)

Derrynoose: The Oak Island (Doire Innis)

Tivenacree: The Hillside of the Branches (Saobh na Craoibh)

Lislea: The Warriors Fort, could also mean Grey Fort (Lios La Lavich)

Mullyard: The High Hill (Mullac Ard)

Lingar: The short leap (Lenm Gearr). Must be a story here.

Cargabolee: Rock of the grey cow (Carraig an Do’ Laoic)

Fergort: Men of the field (Fir Gort)

Doohat: The Black or Dark Place (Dubh Ait)

Tullyherine: Hill of the farm (Tullac Feirm)

Canglisgarron: Rock Fort of the Horses (Carraig lios Garron)

Brackley: Speckled or Grey from Breac, mottled or spotted Clea. The old name is: Ballymaclevy. This could possibly mean the townland of the swords (Baile na Daideama?)

The old name of Kilcam was Ballycolgan.

Gaelic interpretation of names and places taken from Gerry Mone and John Keating articles

Tivenamara: The Hill of the slain

Clea, formerly Cleadgh: Shin Bone of the mountain

Tullanwood: Place of meeting

Garranroe: The Red Horse

Kilcam: Lonely Wood

Mullaghdoy: Lonely Hill

Back to Top

 

6. External links for old photos of Keady area:

     

 

 

Last updated: Friday, March 09, 2012

home | mone history | common ancestor | gathering 2006-08 | gathering 2012 | gathering 2010 | keady & derrynoose | points of contact | tribute | e-mail
	
		
	 
	
	  	

